lt-LT: Skaitytuvo jutiklio tipas: 2D vaizdo formuotuvas; CCD; CIS; Lazerinis; Linijinis vaizdo formuotuvas; Kita
ru: Тип датчика сканера: Сканирование 2D-изображений; CCD; CIS; Лазерный; Сканирование линейных данных; Другой
zh-CN: 扫描仪传感器类型: 二维成像仪; CCD; CIS; 激光; 线性成像仪; 其他
ko: 스캐너 센서 유형: 2D 이미저; CCD; CIS; 레이저; 선형 이미저; 기타
fr: Type de capteur du scanner: Imageur 2D; CCD; CIS; Laser; Lecteur de code-barres; Autre
cs: Typ snímače skeneru: 2D imager; CCD; CIS; Laser; Lineární zobrazovač; Jiné
sv: Sensortyp i streckkodsläsare: 2D-bildare; CCD; CIS; Laser; Linjär bildapparat; Annat
el: Τύπος αισθητήρα σαρωτή: Συσκευή απεικόνισης 2D; CCD; CIS; Λέιζερ; Γραμμική συσκευή απεικόνισης; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta senzora skenera: 2D slika; CCD; CIS; Laserski; Linearna slika; Ostalo
da: Scannersensortype: 2D-billedkamera; CCD; CIS; Laser; Lineær billedmaskine; Andet
fi: Skannerianturityyppi: 2D-kuvantaja; CCD; CIS; Laser; Lineaarinen kuvantaja; Muu
sk-SK: Typ snímača skenera: 2D zobrazovač; CCD; CIS; Laserový; Lineárny zobrazovač; Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta senzorja optičnega bralnika: 2D slikalnik; CCD; CIS; Laser; Linearni slikovnik; Drugo
en: Scanner sensor type: 2D imager; CCD; CIS; Laser; Linear imager; Other
bg-BG: Тип сензор на скенера: 2D визуализатор; CCD; CIS; Лазерен; Линейно визуализиращо устройство; Други
zh-TW: 掃描器感應器類型: 2D 成像儀; CCD; CIS; 雷射; 線性成像儀; 其他
nb: Skannersensortype: 2D-bildeapparat; CCD; CIS; Laser; Lineært bildeapparat; Annen
es: Tipo de sensor de escáner: Generador de imágenes 2D; CCD; CIS; Láser; Generador de imágenes lineal; Otros
hu: Szkennerérzékelő típusa: 2D képalkotó; CCD; CIS; Lézer; Lineáris képalkotó; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de sensor do leitor: Gerador de imagens 2D; CCD; CIS; Laser; Gerador de imagens linear; Outro
pl: Typ czujnika skanera: Kamera 2D; CCD; CIS; Laser; Obrazowanie liniowe; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Tipo de sensor do scanner: Gerador de imagem 2D; CCD; CIS; Laser; Gerador de imagem linear; Outro
tr: Tarayıcı sensör tipi: 2D görüntüleyici; CCD; CIS; Lazer; Doğrusal görüntüleyici; Diğer
th: ประเภทเซ็นเซอร์เครื่องสแกน: เครื่องสแกนบาร์โค้ด 2D; CCD; CIS; เลเซอร์; เครื่องอ่านบาร์โค้ดแบบอ่านรูปภาพ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip senzor scaner: Scaner 2D; CCD; CIS; Laser; Scaner liniar; Altele
de: Typ des Scannersensors: 2D-Imager; CCD; CIS; Laser; Linearer Imager; Sonstiges
vi: Loại cảm biến máy quét: Bộ thu ảnh 2D; CCD; CIS; Laser; Bộ thu ảnh tuyến tính; Khác
it: Tipo di sensore scanner: Riproduttore d'immagini 2D; CCD; CIS; Laser; Immagine lineare; Altro
nl: Type scannersensor: 2D-imager; CCD; CIS; Laser; Linear imager; Andere
ja: スキャナーセンサーの種類: 2Dイメージャー; CCD; CIS; レーザー; リニアイメージャー; その他